Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-561
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-561 to 71-569 shall be known and may be cited as the Aging, Alzheimer's, and Dementia Support Act.

Laws 2022, LB752, § 30;

Laws 2026, LB867, § 13;

Laws 2026, LB913, § 1.
The Revisor of Statutes has pursuant to section 49-769 correlated LB867, section 13, with LB913, section 1, to reflect all amendments.Changes made by LB867 became operative July 18, 2026. Changes made by LB913 became effective July 18, 2026.